src/phonology/yrk-phon.xfscript
! This file is a script for the Xerox xfst interface.
! It gives the morphophonological rules for Nenets.


! In this file, testcases are marked as follows:

! space exclmark euro space upper:lower
! Please add tests for eventual new rules or problems

! To test: in kt/yrk/src, do:
! xfst -e "source xfst-yrk.txt"
! 
! save s
! quit
! cat xfst-yrk.txt | grep €|cut -d" " -f3|cut -d":" -f1|lookup s


clear stack


! Definition section !
! ================== !

echo << THE DEFININTIONS >>

define CnsNotGlots [ б | в | г | д | ж | з 
           | Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З 
           | й | к | л | м | н | п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц 
           | Й | К | Л | М | Н | П | Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц 
           | ч | ш | щ 
           | Ч | Ш | Щ ] ;



define NasGlots [ Н1 | Ӈ1 ] ; ! Nasal Glottals

define NonNasGlots [ Д1 | С1 ] ; ! NonNasal Glottals

define Glots [ NasGlots | NonNasGlots ] ;

define Cns [ Glots | CnsNotGlots ] ;

define Dummy %> ;



! Rule section !
! ============ !

echo << THE RULES >>


define VowelCorrelation [ А1 -> а || [ а | я ]  %> х _ ,,
                          А1 -> а || [ Cns  %> | %> а ] х _ ,,
                          А1 -> о || [ о | ё ]  %> х _ ,,
                          А1 -> э || [ ы | э | е ]  %> х _ ] ;

define StemFinalYToE ы -> э || _ %> х э  ;
 !€ ты>хА1на:тэхэна

define GlottalNonNasalToSurface [ С1 -> с , Д1 -> д || _ %> [ м .#. | ʼ .#. | ˮ .#. | Ы1 ] ,,
     Ы1 -> о || [ а | я | [ .#. | CnsNotGlots ] [ у | о | э | ы ] ] [ CnsNotGlots | Glots ] %> _ ,,
                     Ы1 -> е || [ е | ю | ё | и ] [ CnsNotGlots | Glots]  %> _ ,,
  Н1 -> н , Ӈ1 -> ӈ || _ %> Ы1 ,,  Н1 -> 0 , Ӈ1  -> 0 || _ %> [ м | ʼ ] ] ;
 !€ тохоС1>м:тохосм
 !€ мяД1>м:мядм

define mToV [ м -> в || _ ʼ %> [ Ы1 | ʼ | м ʼ ] ,, н -> д ||  м  ʼ %> _ ʼ ,, ʼ -> 0 || м  _ %> [ Ы1 | ʼ | м ʼ| н ʼ | х А1 ] ,, х -> г ||  м  ʼ %> _ А1 ,, А1 -> а ||  м  ʼ %> х _  ] ;

define UnderlyingToGlottal [ С1 -> ˮ , Д1 -> ˮ || _  [ .#. | %> м н а] ,,
                             Н1  -> ʼ , Ӈ1  -> ʼ || _   .#.   ] ;
 !€ мяД1:мяˮ
 !€ тохоС1:тохоˮ
 !€ таН1:таʼ
 !€ выӇ1:выʼ

define VowelPalatalization [ а -> я , у -> ю || й %> _ ] ;

define jLoss й -> 0 || _ %> [ я | ю ] ;

define GlottalNonNasalToZERO [ Д1 -> 0 , С1 ( ь ) -> 0 || _ %> [ х | н ] ,,
                               н -> т || [ Д1 | С1 ( ь ) ] %> _ ,,
                               д -> 0 || Д1 %> н _ ,,
                               х -> к || Д1 %> _ ,,
                               х -> к || С1 %> _ ] ;

define GlottalNasalToHomNasal [ Н1 -> ӈ , Ӈ1  -> ӈ || _ %> х ,,
                                Н1 -> н , Ӈ1  -> н || _ %> [ т | н ʼ ] ,,
                                н -> д || [ м  | Н1 | Ӈ1 ] %> _ ʼ ,, 
                                х -> г || Н1 %> _ ,,
                                х -> г || Ӈ1 %> _ ] ;

define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;



read regex [

    VowelCorrelation
.o. StemFinalYToE
.o. VowelPalatalization
.o. jLoss
.o. GlottalNonNasalToSurface
.o. GlottalNonNasalToZERO
.o. GlottalNasalToHomNasal
.o. mToV
.o. UnderlyingToGlottal
.o. DummyDeletion
] ;
